Nebraska, session 109, LB74.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB74 LB74
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 49-1446.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
49-1446.03 Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act, any committee may, in addition to the
expenditures set forth in section 49-1446.01, make expenditures for the
following:
(1) The necessary continued operation of the campaign office or
offices of the candidate or political committee;
(2) Social events primarily for the benefit of campaign workers and
volunteers or constituents;
(3) Obtaining public input and opinion;
(4) Repayment of campaign loans incurred prior to election day;
(5) Newsletters and other communications for the purpose of
information, thanks, acknowledgment, or greetings or for the purpose of
political organization and planning;
(6) Gifts of acknowledgment, including flowers and charitable
contributions, except that gifts to any one individual shall not exceed
fifty dollars in any one calendar year;
(7) Meals, lodging, and travel by an officeholder related to the
officeholder's his or her candidacy and for members of the immediate
family of the officeholder when involved in activities related to the
officeholder's his or her candidacy;
(8) Conference fees, meals, lodging, and travel by an officeholder,
the officeholder's minor children, and the officeholder's and his or her
staff when the officeholder or staff is involved in activities related to
the duties of the officeholder his or her public office; and
(9) Child care services incurred by an officeholder when the
officeholder is involved in activities related to the duties of the
officeholder; and
(10) (9) In the case of the candidate committee for the Governor,
conference fees, meals, lodging, and travel by the Governor, the
-2-

LB74 LB74
2025 2025
Governor's his or her staff, and the Governor's his or her immediate
family, when involved in activities related to the duties of the
Governor.
Sec. 2. Original section 49-1446.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-